Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-432
Director conveying or losing interest in land; vacancy created.

If any director shall sell and convey his assessed realty and not be an officer of a company interested, he shall no longer serve as director or officer.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 26, p. 484;

R.S.1913, § 1896;

C.S.1922, § 1844;

C.S.1929, § 31-532;

R.S.1943, § 31-432.